Maryland, session 2026, SB0477.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Occupations and Professions
16–401.
(a) Subject to the provisions of subsection (b) of this section, a licensed real estate
appraiser shall keep, for [5] 12 years from the date of delivery to the client, the original or
a copy of:
(1) each contract the licensee enters into for the provision of real estate
appraisal services;
(2) each appraisal report the licensee prepares or signs; and
(3) all supporting data that the licensee assembles or formulates to prepare
an appraisal report.
(b) If, within the [5–year] 12–YEAR period for the retention of records, a licensed
real estate appraiser is given notice that an appraisal or appraisal report is involved in
litigation, a new [5–year] 12–YEAR period shall start on the date of the final disposition of
the litigation.
(c) On request, a licensed real estate appraiser shall make any record required to
be kept under this section available to the Commission to inspect or copy.
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
5–122.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “APPRAISAL” MEANS AN ANALYSIS, A CONCLUSION, OR AN
OPINION ABOUT THE NATURE, QUALITY, UTILITY, OR VALUE OF INTERESTS IN OR
ASPECTS OF IDENTIFIED REAL ESTATE.

SENATE BILL 477 3
(II) “APPRAISAL” INCLUDES:
1. A VALUATION APPRAISAL;
2. AN ANALYSIS ASSIGNMENT; AND
3. A REVIEW ASSIGNMENT.
(III) “APPRAISAL” DOES NOT INCLUDE AN OPINION PROVIDED
TO A POTENTIAL SELLER OR THIRD PARTY BY A PERSON LICENSED UNDER TITLE 17
OF THE BUSINESS OCCUPATIONS AND PROFESSIONS ARTICLE ABOUT THE
RECOMMENDED LISTING PRICE OR RECOMMENDED PURCHASE PRICE OF REAL
ESTATE, PROVIDED THAT THE OPINION IS NOT REFERRED TO AS AN APPRAISAL.
(3) “FEDERALLY RELATED TRANSACTION” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN THE FEDERAL FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS REFORM, RECOVERY, AND
ENFORCEMENT ACT OF 1989.
(B) (1) THIS EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THIS SECTION APPLIES TO A CIVIL ACTION FOR DAMAGES AGAINST A
PERSON FOR AN ALLEGED ACT OR OMISSION RELATED TO THE PERFORMANCE,
REVIEW, SUPERVISION, OR MANAGEMENT OF AN APPRAISAL, REGARDLESS OF
WHETHER THE APPRAISAL IS IN CONNECTION WITH A FEDERALLY RELATED
TRANSACTION.
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY:
(I) TO A CIVIL ACTION FOR AN ALLEGED DISCRIMINATORY
HOUSING PRACTICE RELATED TO THE APPRAISAL OF RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY
UNDER § 20–1035 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE;
(II) TO ADMINISTRATIVE ACTIONS OF THE COMMISSION OF
REAL ESTATE APPRAISERS, APPRAISAL MANAGEMENT COMPANIES, AND HOME
INSPECTORS; OR
(II) (III) IF KNOWLEDGE OF THE CIVIL ACTION WAS
CONCEALED BY FRAUD.
(C) A CIVIL ACTION SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION SHALL BE FILED WITHIN THE
EARLIER OF:
(1) 2 YEARS AFTER THE DATE THAT THE COMPLAINANT KNEW OR
REASONABLY SHOULD HAVE KNOWN OF THE ACT OR OMISSION; OR

SENATE BILL 477
(2) 4 YEARS AFTER THE DATE WHEN THE PERFORMANCE, REVIEW,
SUPERVISION, OR MANAGEMENT OF AN APPRAISAL, AS APPLICABLE, WAS PROVIDED
OR SHOULD HAVE BEEN PROVIDED.
Article – State Government
20–1035.
(a) In accordance with this section, an aggrieved person may commence a civil
action in an appropriate State court to obtain appropriate relief for an alleged
discriminatory housing practice or the breach of a conciliation agreement entered into
under this part.
(b) (1) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE action shall be filed within 2 years after the later of the occurrence or
termination of the alleged discriminatory housing practice or the breach of the conciliation
agreement.
(2) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the
computation of the 2–year period does not include any time during which an administrative
proceeding under this part was pending for a complaint or charge based on the alleged
discriminatory housing practice.
(ii) Subparagraph (i) of this paragraph does not apply to an action
arising from a breach of a conciliation agreement.
(3) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH DOES NOT APPLY TO A CIVIL ACTION
DESCRIBED UNDER PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, an aggrieved
person may commence a civil action under this section:
[(i)] 1. not sooner than 130 days after a complaint has been filed
under § 20–1021 of this subtitle; and
[(ii)] 2. regardless of the status of any complaint.
(4) A CIVIL ACTION FOR AN ALLEGED DISCRIMINATORY HOUSING
PRACTICE RELATED TO THE APPRAISAL OF RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY SHALL BE
FILED WITHIN 12 YEARS AFTER THE LATER OF THE OCCURRENCE OR TERMINATION
OF THE ALLEGED DISCRIMINATORY HOUSING PRACTICE OR THE BREACH OF A
CONCILIATION AGREEMENT.

SENATE BILL 477 5
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any cause of action accruing before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.